Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Dealer Practices.

Cross references. —

For violation of AS

45.25.400

—

45.25.590

as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Sec. 45.25.400.
Prohibited use of advertising terms.

A motor vehicle dealer may not use the term “invoice,” “factory invoice,” “dealer invoice,” “dealer cost,” “wholesale price,” or any other term of similar meaning in an advertisement for the sale of a motor vehicle.

A motor vehicle dealer may use the term “manufacturer’s suggested retail price,” “MSRP,” or “list price” in an advertisement for the sale of a motor vehicle, subject to the restriction on price comparisons in AS

45.25.450

and the following:

the manufacturer’s suggested retail price or list price must reference the final price listed by the manufacturer on the Monroney sticker, including accessories and options physically attached to the vehicle at the time of delivery to the dealer, plus any transportation charges;

the manufacturer’s suggested retail price or the list price does not include charges added by the dealer or options added to the vehicle by the dealer; and

whenever using the term “manufacturer’s suggested retail price,” “MSRP,” or “list price,” the dealer may not represent that a buyer would save money by paying a price that is lower than the “manufacturer’s suggested retail price,” “MSRP,” or “list price” unless the representation refers to savings from the “manufacturer’s suggested retail price,” “MSRP,” or “list price.”

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 171 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, in (b)(1), substituted “manufacturer’s suggested retail price or list” for “advertised”; and deleted “, and minus all manufacturer discounts and savings” at the end; in (b)(3), added “unless the representation refers to savings from the ‘manufacturer’s suggested retail price,’ ‘MSRP,’ or ‘list price’.” at the end; made related stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.25.410.
Availability of advertised items.

A motor vehicle dealer may not advertise a new motor vehicle at a specified dealer price with the intent not to supply reasonably expected demand, unless the advertisement discloses the number of vehicles in stock at the advertised price.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 171 SLA 2004)

Sec. 45.25.420.
Display of motor vehicles.

A motor vehicle dealer shall display all vehicles advertised for sale for the duration of the sale period in a conspicuous and clearly visible location on the dealer’s premises. The advertised sale price for each vehicle must be clearly marked on the vehicle so the consumer can readily identify the advertised price for the vehicle.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.430.
Refusal to sell on advertised terms and conditions.

A motor vehicle dealer may not refuse to sell a motor vehicle on the terms and conditions that the dealer has advertised. This section does not apply if

the dealer can document that the advertised term or condition was the result of an error on the part of the advertising medium or an outside advertising agent; or

the refusal is based on an error that was made in good faith by the dealer and was clearly and conspicuously a mistake, and the dealer corrected the error as soon as the dealer knew or reasonably should have known of the error.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.440.
Advertised price.

A motor vehicle dealer’s advertised price for a motor vehicle must include all dealer fees and costs, except for fees, such as licensing fees, registration fees, title transfer fees, and sales taxes, actually paid to a government agency. In this section, “dealer fees and costs” includes dealer preparation fees, document preparation fees, surcharges, and other dealer-imposed fees and costs.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, rewrote the section.

Sec. 45.25.450.
Advertised price comparisons, reductions, and discounts.

A motor vehicle dealer may not make a price comparison, price reduction, or price discount in an advertisement unless the comparison, reduction, or discount complies with this section.

A motor vehicle dealer may advertise a price comparison for a new motor vehicle with the manufacturer’s suggested retail price only if

the dealer only uses the term “manufacturer’s suggested retail price,” “MSRP,” or “list price”;

the advertised price references the final price listed by the manufacturer on the Monroney sticker; and

the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, MSRP, or list price does not include charges added by the dealer or options added to the vehicle by the dealer.

A motor vehicle dealer may not use a competitor’s price as a reference price unless

the reference price is the competitor’s current, bona fide price in the trade area of the dealer making the comparison;

the comparison is to an identical or nearly identical vehicle that does not materially differ in model, style, design, name, brand, kind, or quality from the advertised product; and

the dealer includes in the advertised price all charges that the competitor includes in the competitor’s price.

A motor vehicle dealer shall be in possession of documents and all other information necessary to substantiate all reference price claims when the claims are made and shall maintain this information in a readily accessible place for two years after the time the reference price claims are made.

A motor vehicle dealer may advertise a price comparison for a used motor vehicle only if the reference price is the retail value of the vehicle as specified in the current edition of a nationally recognized valuation publication for used motor vehicles.

When advertising a price comparison for a used motor vehicle, the advertisement must identify the source of the reference price, and the motor vehicle dealer shall make this source available to a potential retail buyer on request.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am §§ 3, 4 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, deleted (b)(4) and (b)(5), and made related stylistic changes; added (e) and (f).

Sec. 45.25.460.
Advertising and selling practices generally.

In addition to the provisions of AS

45.50.471

and regulations adopted under AS

45.50.471

, a motor vehicle dealer

may not represent the dealer document preparation fee as a government fee;

may not advertise a specific motor vehicle for sale unless the vehicle identification number, vehicle stocking number, or license number is disclosed in the advertisement or made available by the dealer on request of a retail buyer;

may not use the term “rebate,” “cash back,” or a similar term in advertising the sale of a motor vehicle unless the rebate is expressed in a specific dollar amount and is in fact a rebate offered by the vehicle manufacturer or distributor directly to the retail buyer of the vehicle;

may not require a person, in order to receive the advertised credit terms, to pay a higher price for a motor vehicle and any related goods or services than the cash price the same person would have to pay to purchase the same vehicle and related goods or services;

may not advertise a guaranteed trade-in allowance or range of allowances unless the guarantee is provided by the manufacturer or distributor;

may not affix to a new motor vehicle a supplemental price sticker containing a price that represents the dealer’s asking price if the supplemental price sticker exceeds the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, unless the supplemental sticker

clearly and conspicuously, in the largest print appearing on the sticker other than the print size used for the dealer’s name, discloses that the supplemental sticker price is the dealer’s asking price, or words of similar meaning, and is not the manufacturer’s suggested retail price;

clearly and conspicuously discloses the manufacturer’s suggested retail price; and

states, if the supplemental sticker price is greater than the sum of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price and the price of the items added by the dealer, the difference and describes it as additional dealer mark-up;

may not advertise or otherwise represent, or knowingly allow to be advertised or represented on behalf of the dealer, that a down payment is not required in connection with the sale of a motor vehicle when a down payment is in fact required;

may not advertise an offer for the sale, lease, or purchase of a motor vehicle that does not contain the name of the dealer;

may not represent and sell as a new motor vehicle a demonstrator vehicle or a motor vehicle that is a used motor vehicle; in this paragraph, “demonstrator vehicle”

means a motor vehicle

that has been assigned by a dealer for use by the dealership as an executive vehicle for promotional purposes, including being driven in the community;

that has not been licensed by a retail buyer; and

the title of which has not been transferred to a retail buyer;

does not include a motor vehicle that has only been driven to demonstrate the motor vehicle to a prospective buyer;

may not advertise that the dealer finances any person or does not reject any person’s credit, or make similar claims;

may not advertise or make a statement, declaration, or representation in an advertisement that cannot be substantiated in fact; the burden of proof of the factual basis for the statement, declaration, or representation is on the dealer.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 171 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am §§ 3, 9 ch 171 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment effective August 27, 2012, in (a), deleted (a)(1) and (a)(4), and redesignated the remaining paragraphs; in (a)(2), substituted “unless the vehicle identification number” for “without identifying the vehicle by either its vehicle identification number” and added “is disclosed in the advertisement or made available by the dealer on request of a retail buyer” following “license number.”

Sec. 45.25.465.
Sales of used motor vehicles; required disclosures.

Before the sale of a used motor vehicle, a motor vehicle dealer shall,

when obtaining a used motor vehicle from an individual consumer, make a reasonable inquiry of the seller into the condition of the vehicle, including the accident and repair history of the vehicle; the information shall be recorded in writing and signed by the seller; the dealer shall provide this information to a prospective purchaser of the vehicle;

when a motor vehicle dealer obtains a used motor vehicle from another motor vehicle dealer, a wholesaler, or an auction, disclose to a prospective purchaser of the vehicle that the vehicle was purchased from another dealer, a wholesaler, or an auction.

Nothing in this section creates an express warranty by the dealer.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 56 SLA 2008.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 171 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2008; am § 6 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, in (a)(1) substituted “signed by the seller” for “verified by the seller”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 56, SLA 2008, the 2008 repeal of (c) of this section, which has the effect of eliminating certain required disclosures about a used motor vehicle, applies retroactively to sales of those vehicles that occurred on or after October 24, 2004, subject to conditions otherwise specified in that section. See § 2, ch. 56, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.25.470.
Sales of vehicles manufactured for sale in a foreign country.

Before sale, a motor vehicle dealer shall disclose in writing whether a motor vehicle was originally manufactured for sale in Canada or another foreign country.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.480.
Identification number plates.

A motor vehicle dealer may not knowingly purchase or sell a vehicle that has an altered or removed vehicle identification number plate, or alter or remove a vehicle identification number plate.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.490.
Required documentation.

A motor vehicle dealer may not enter into a contract to sell a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle dealer holds a manufacturer’s statement of origin, a title, or another properly executed document reasonably necessary to obtain the statement of origin or title for transfer of the vehicle to the buyer.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, substituted “enter into a contract to sell a motor vehicle” for “sell or offer to sell a motor vehicle”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 50, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply “to motor vehicle contracts entered into on or after August 27, 2012.”

Sec. 45.25.500.
Trade-ins.

A motor vehicle dealer may not transfer title to a trade-in vehicle or perform any repairs or reconditioning on a trade-in vehicle before the completion of the sales transaction for which the vehicle is a trade-in.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.510.
Disclosure of damages.

Before entering into a new motor vehicle sales contract, a new motor vehicle dealer shall disclose in writing to a buyer of the new motor vehicle any known damage and repair to the new motor vehicle if the damage exceeds five percent of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price as calculated at the dealer’s authorized warranty rate for labor and parts, or $1,000, whichever amount is greater. A new motor vehicle dealer is not required to disclose to a buyer that glass, tires, bumpers, or cosmetic parts of a new motor vehicle were damaged at any time if the damaged item has been replaced with original or comparable equipment. A replaced part is not part of the cumulative damage required to be disclosed under this subsection.

If disclosure is not required under this section, a buyer may not revoke or rescind a sales contract due to the fact that the new motor vehicle was damaged and repaired before completion of the sale.

In this section,

“cosmetic parts” means parts that are attached by and can be replaced in total through the use of screws, bolts, or other fasteners without the use of welding or thermal cutting and includes windshields, bumpers, hoods, or trim panels;

“manufacturer’s suggested retail price” means the retail price of the new motor vehicle suggested by the manufacturer and includes the retail delivered price suggested by the manufacturer for each accessory or item of optional equipment physically attached to the new motor vehicle at the time of delivery to the new motor vehicle dealer that is not included within the retail price suggested by the manufacturer for the new motor vehicle.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 171 SLA 2004)

Sec. 45.25.520.
Form of disclosures.

Except as provided in AS

45.25.460(a)(6)(A)

, if a disclosure is required by this chapter with respect to a motor vehicle advertisement, the disclosure must be made in a clear and conspicuous manner.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment effective August 27, 2012, substituted “AS

45.25.460(a)(6)(A)

” for “AS 45.25.460(a)(8)(A).”

Sec. 45.25.530.
Disclosure regarding receipt of commissions.

If a motor vehicle dealer’s service operations employees receive a commission for the amount of work they perform, the motor vehicle dealer shall post a conspicuous sign that is visible to service customers that the dealer’s service operations employees work on commission.

History.

(§ 6 ch 171 SLA 2004)

Sec. 45.25.590.
Definitions.

In AS

45.25.400

—

45.25.590

,

“advertise,” “advertised,” “advertising,” and “advertisement” include representations, whether made on or off store premises, made to persons in the print media, in the broadcast media, on the computer, in a brochure, in a flyer, by direct mail, by sign, or on a tag;

“Monroney sticker” means the window sticker required by 15 U.S.C. 1231 — 1233 (Automobile Information Disclosure Act);

“motor vehicle,” notwithstanding the definition of “motor vehicle” in AS

45.25.990

, means a vehicle, including a trailer, that is required to be registered under AS 28.10, but does not include a motorcycle;

“new motor vehicle,” notwithstanding the definition of “new motor vehicle” in AS

45.25.990

, means a motor vehicle that has not been titled to anyone and still retains the original manufacturer’s certificate of origin.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)